Utah statutes.
53A-11-1301.   Definitions.

(1)  The definitions in Sections 58-37-2, 58-37a-3, and 58-37b-2 apply to this part.

(2)  As used in this part:

(a)  "Prohibited act" means an act punishable under Section 53A-3-501, Section 58-37-8, Section 58-37a-5, or Title 58, Chapter 37b.

(b)  "School" means a public or private elementary or secondary school.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

